California, session 20252026, SB1413.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25724 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25724. (a) Beginning no later than the 2024–25 fiscal year, the Department of General Services shall ensure that at least 50 percent of the light-duty vehicles purchased for the state vehicle fleet each fiscal year are zero-emission vehicles.(b) This section shall does not apply to vehicles that have special performance requirements necessary for the protection of public safety, as defined by the Department of General Services.(c) (1) If the Department of General Services determines that it cannot meet the needs of the state while fulfilling the requirements of this section, the department shall hold a public hearing to make that finding, notify the Secretary of State of the finding, and cease to implement implementing this section.(2) The Department of General Services may base the finding required pursuant to paragraph (1) on a determination that fulfilling the requirements of this section would result in costs that are not substantially absorbable by the department when purchasing those light-duty vehicles.